Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201468-605
Contributions by state employees;
amount.

Every employee of the state whose services are covered
by an agreement entered into under sections 68-603 and 68-604 shall be required
to pay for the period of such coverage, contributions, with respect to wages,
as defined in section 68-602, equal to the amount of tax which would be imposed
by the Federal Insurance Contributions Act if such services constituted employment
within the meaning of that act. Such liability shall arise in consideration
of the employee's retention in the service of the state, or his or her entry
upon such service, after the enactment of sections 68-601 to 68-631.

Laws 1951, c. 297, § 4(1), p. 980;

Laws 1955, c. 264, § 5, p. 817;

Laws 1987, LB 3, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 1216, § 12;

Laws 2010, LB684, § 5.